New York, session 2025-2026, A8944.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new 2 section 2.25 to read as follows: 3 § 2.25 Peace officer identity concealment; prohibited. 4 1. A law enforcement officer, which shall include any person desig- 5 nated as a peace officer under article two of the criminal procedure 6 law, shall not wear any mask or personal disguise while interacting with 7 the public in the performance of their duties, except for medical grade 8 masks which are surgical or N95 respirators designed to prevent the 9 transmission of airborne diseases and masks designed to protect against 10 exposure to smoke when responding to fires or during a state of emergen- 11 cy related to wildfires. 12 2. The provisions of subdivision one of this section shall not apply 13 to special weapons and tactics (SWAT) team officers utilizing such 14 equipment as necessary to protect such officers' faces from physical 15 harm while performing SWAT responsibilities. 16 3. All law enforcement officers shall include such officer's name, 17 badge number, or both on such officer's uniforms. 18 4. For the purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" means 19 any officer of a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency, or any 20 person acting on behalf of a local, state, or federal law enforcement 21 agency. 22 5. The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of 23 this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13484-01-5 A. 8944 2 1 not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect 2 without the invalid provision or application. 3 6. The attorney general shall have the authority to promulgate and 4 enforce rules and regulations regarding the provisions of this section. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.